Alabama, session 2026rs, SB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"invisible disability" means a physical or mental condition
that may interfere with an individual's ability to communicate
with a first responder, including:
(1) A communication impediment;
(2) Hearing loss;
(3) Blindness or a visual impairment;
Page 1

(3) Blindness or a visual impairment;
SB329 INTRODUCED
(4) Autism spectrum disorder;
(5) Traumatic brain injury;
(6) Schizophrenia;
(7) Alzheimer's disease or dementia;
(8) Post traumatic stress disorder;
(9) Epilepsy;
(10) A developmental disability;
(11) Down syndrome;
(12) Diabetes;
(13) A heart condition; or
(14) A cognitive disability.
(b) Notwithstanding Sections 32-6-64, 32-6-65, 32-6-67,
and 32-6-68, Code of Alabama 1975, an owner of a motor vehicle
who is a resident of Alabama and who has been diagnosed with
an invisible disability or an individual who is the primary
caretaker of an individual who has been diagnosed with an
invisible disability shall be issued a license plate of the
individual's choosing and a "Invisible Disability" license
plate decal upon:
(1) Application to the judge of probate, license
commissioner, or other issuing official;
(2) Compliance with motor vehicle registration and
licensing laws;
(3) Payment of regular fees required by law for license
plates for private passenger or pleasure motor vehicles;
(4) Payment of any additional fees required by law for
a distinctive license plate, should the individual seek to be
issued a distinctive license plate; and
Page 2

issued a distinctive license plate; and
SB329 INTRODUCED
(5) Presentation of a diagnosis from a physician
licensed to practice medicine in this state as proof of
eligibility.
(c) The validity of the "Invisible Disability" license
plate decals shall coincide with the reissuance of the
registrant's license plate as provided in Section 32-6-62,
Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Payment of required license fees and taxes for the
years during which a new plate is not issued shall be
evidenced as provided in Section 32-6-63, Code of Alabama
1975.
(e) Kulturecity, Incorporated shall be responsible for
the design of the license plate decal subject to approval by
the Commissioner of Revenue and compliance with all laws and
rules.
(f) The "Invisible Disability" decal provided by this
section shall not qualify the individual to be parked in
special access parking as provided in Sections 40-12-300 and
32-6-231, Code of Alabama 1975, unless the individual has been
issued a disability distinctive special access plate or
placard as provided for in those sections.
(g) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules to
implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 3